Alabama, session 2026rs, HB109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) The special district tax now levied and collected
for public hospital purposes pursuant to Section 2-10.41,
Page 1

for public hospital purposes pursuant to Section 2-10.41,
HB109 INTRODUCED
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, in election precincts one
through seven of Baldwin County, as the precincts existed on
July 27, 1965, shall be continued, as provided in subsection
(b), upon approval of this amendment and by simultaneous
approval of a majority of the qualified electors in election
precincts 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 21, 26, 27, and 45 of Baldwin County as the precincts
existed on January 1, 2025, voting thereon in the
constitutional election ratifying this proposed amendment.
(b) Upon ratification, the Baldwin County Commission
shall continue to levy and cause to be collected annually,
beginning October 1, 2027, for a period of 20 years, in
addition to any taxes now authorized or that may be hereafter
authorized by the constitution and laws of this state, a
special district tax of two mills on each one dollar ($1)
assessed valuation of taxable property in election precincts
1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 21, 26,
27, and 45 of Baldwin County, Alabama, as the precincts
existed on January 1, 2025, to be used exclusively for public
hospital purposes, as defined in Section 215.03, within these
election precincts.
(c) The Baldwin County Commission, in anticipation of
tax proceeds, may issue, without further election, interest
bearing tax anticipation bonds, warrants, or certificates of
indebtedness of the county payable solely from and secured by
a pledge of a sufficient amount of the annual proceeds from
the tax received by the county.
(d) The Baldwin County Commission may designate, as the
Page 2

(d) The Baldwin County Commission may designate, as the
HB109 INTRODUCED
agency of the county, any public corporation heretofore or
hereafter organized for hospital purposes in the county to
construct, acquire, equip, operate, and maintain public
hospital facilities for election precincts 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7,
11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 21, 26, 27, and 45 of
Baldwin County, Alabama, as the precincts existed on January
1, 2025. When a public corporation has been designated, the
proceeds of the tax thereafter collected shall be paid to it
and shall be used for any public hospital purpose. The Baldwin
County Commission's payments to the public corporation shall
be made only to the extent as will not result in the
impairment of the obligation of any contract made with respect
to the tax. The public corporation may anticipate the proceeds
from the tax by issuing, for any purpose for which the tax has
been voted, the bonds, warrants, or certificates of
indebtedness of the corporation and may pledge for the payment
of the principal thereof and interest thereon a sufficient
amount of the annual proceeds from the tax.
(e)(1) No securities issued or contracts made by
Baldwin County under the authority of this amendment, which
are payable solely out of the proceeds of the tax, and no
securities issued or contracts made by the corporation,
whether or not issued or made under the authority of this
amendment, shall be construed to be bonds of Baldwin County or
of a political subdivision of the county within the meaning of
Section 222, or construed to create or constitute an
indebtedness of the county within the meaning of Section 224.
(2) The securities shall be construed to be negotiable
Page 3

(2) The securities shall be construed to be negotiable
HB109 INTRODUCED
instruments notwithstanding the fact that the bonds may be
payable solely from a limited source.
(f) All pledges of the tax and all contracts made with
respect to the tax pursuant to this amendment shall take
precedence in the order in which the pledges are made and
shall create a charge on the proceeds of the tax prior to the
expenses of operating and maintaining any public hospital
facilities.
(g) This amendment shall be self-executing.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
100 grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
101 internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
102 language; and translate effective dates.
103 END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
104 Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
105 shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
106 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
107 of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
108 a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
109 the election ballot and shall set forth the following
110 description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
111 constitutional amendment:
112 "Relating to Baldwin County, proposing an amendment to
Page 4

"Relating to Baldwin County, proposing an amendment to
HB109 INTRODUCED
113 the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to provide for the
114 continuation of the existing levy of a two mill ad valorem tax
115 for public hospital purposes in election precincts 1, 2, 4, 5,
116 6, 7, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 21, 26, 27, and 45
117 in the county.
118 Proposed by Act ____."
119 This description shall be followed by the following
120 language:
121 "Yes( ) No( )."
122 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
123 part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
124 a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 5